Washington statutes.
RCW 6.25.230

Custody of property or proceeds.

All moneys received by the sheriff under the provisions of this chapter shall be paid to the clerk of the court that issued the writ, to be held to be applied to any judgment that may be recovered in the action, and all other attached property shall be retained by the sheriff to be applied to any judgment that may be recovered in the action.

[ 1987 c 442 s 823; 1886 p 43 s 17; RRS s 663. Prior: Code 1881 ss 174-192; 1877 pp 35-40; 1873 pp 43-50; 1871 pp 9, 10; 1869 pp 41-47; 1863 pp 112-120; 1860 pp 30-36; 1854 pp 155-162. Formerly RCW 7.12.170.]